ext/spell/lv_LV.aff
SFX c Y 25
SFX c  0   ies    [ā]t    #relf.nenoteiksme
SFX c  āt  os     [ā]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  āt  ies    [ā]t    #tag, IIp
SFX c  t   mies   [ā]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  āt  ieties [ā]t    #pavēle
SFX c  āt  oties  [ā]t    #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX c  t   šoties [ā]t    #atst.izst.v.nak
SFX c  0   ies    [ē]t    #relf.nenoteiksme ----------
SFX c  ēt  os     [ē]t    #tag, Ip 
SFX c  ēt  ies    [ē]t    #tag, IIp
SFX c  ēt  as     [ē]t    #tag, IIIp
SFX c  ēt  amies  [ē]t    #tag, Ip.d.
SFX c  ēt  aties  [ē]t    #tag, IIp.d
SFX c  ēt  ieties [ē]t    #pavēle
SFX c  ēt  oties  [ē]t    #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX c  t   šoties [ē]t    #atst.izst.v.nak ------
SFX c  0   ies    [ī]t    #relf.nenoteiksme
SFX c  īt  os     [ī]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  īt  ies    [ī]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  īt  ās     [ī]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  īt  āmies  [ī]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  īt  āties  [ī]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  īt  ieties [ī]t    #
SFX c  īt  oties  [ī]t    #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX c  t   šoties [ī]t    #atst.izst.v.nak
#SFX c  0   os     [ā]t    #cieshamaa k.
#SFX c  0   os     [ē]t    #cieshamaa k.
#SFX c  0   os     [ī]t    #cieshamaa k.

SFX 6 Y 104
SFX 6   t     ju      [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     0       [bmp]t
SFX 6   t     j       [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jam     [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jat     [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jot     [āēubmp]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   t     jiet    [āēu]t    #pavēle
SFX 6   t     iet    [bmp]t    #pavēle
SFX 6   t     j       [āēu]t
SFX 6   gt    dzu     [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dz      [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzam    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzat    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzot    [g]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   gt    dziet   [g]t
SFX 6   kt    cu      [k]t
SFX 6   kt    c       [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cam     [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cat     [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cot     [k]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   kt    ciet    [k]t
SFX 6   ūt    uju     [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    uj      [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujam    [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujat    [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujot    [ū]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   ūt    ujiet   [ū]t
SFX 6   zt    žu      [z]t
SFX 6   t     0       [z]t
SFX 6   zt    ž       [z]t
SFX 6   zt    žam     [z]t
SFX 6   zt    žat     [z]t
SFX 6   zt    žot     [z]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   t     iet     [lz]t
SFX 6   lt    ļu      [l]t
SFX 6   t     0       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļ       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļam     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļat     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļot     [l]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   t     u       [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     0       [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     am      [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     at      [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     iet     [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     ot     [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   ārt   aru     [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   ar      [ā]rt  # ā ē speciālie
SFX 6   ārt   aram    [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   arat    [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   arot    [ā]rt    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   ārt   ariet   [ā]rt
SFX 6   ērt   eru     [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   er      [ē]rt  # ā ē speciālie
SFX 6   ērt   eram    [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   erat    [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   erot    [ē]rt    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   ērt   eriet   [ē]rt
SFX 6  zt   žošs     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žoša     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošam    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošu     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošā     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošas    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošai    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žoši     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošiem   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošus    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošos    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošām    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošās    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošais   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajam  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošo     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajā   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajai  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošie    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajiem [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajos  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajām  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žošajās  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žams     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žama     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamam    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamu     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamā     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamas    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamai    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žami     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamiem   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamus    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamos    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamām    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamās    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamais   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajam  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamo     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajā   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajai  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamie    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajiem [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajos  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajām  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   žamajās  [z]t

SFX 2 Y 7
SFX 2   st     žu     [s]t   # tagadne
SFX 2   st     d      [s]t
SFX 2   st     ž      [s]t
SFX 2   st     žam    [s]t
SFX 2   st     žat    [s]t
SFX 2   st     žot    [s]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 2   st     diet   [s]t

SFX 3 Y 6
SFX 3   st     šu     [s]t
SFX 3   t      0      [s]t
SFX 3   st     š      [s]t
SFX 3   st     šam    [s]t
SFX 3   st     šat    [s]t
SFX 3   st     šot    [s]t    #atst.izt.v.tag

SFX 7 Y 12
SFX 7   t   stu   [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   sti   [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   st    [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stam  [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stat  [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stot  [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stiet [^sz]t
SFX 7   0   i    [sz]t
SFX 7   0   am   [sz]t
SFX 7   0   at   [sz]t
SFX 7   0   ot   [sz]t
SFX 7   0   iet  [sz]t

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   t    dams    t
SFX M   t    dama    t
SFX M   t    dami    t
SFX M   t    damas   t

SFX N Y 4
SFX N   st   zdams   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdama   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdami   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdamas  [s]t

SFX [ Y 5
SFX [   t    damies    t
SFX [   t    damās     t
SFX [   t    šanos     [^sz]t
SFX [   st   šanos     [s]t
SFX [   zt   šanos     [z]t

SFX ] Y 2
SFX ]   st   zdamies [s]t
SFX ]   st   zdamās  [s]t

SFX { Y 3
SFX { t  jušies    t
SFX { t  jusies    t
SFX { t  jošies    t

SFX } Y 3
SFX } t  ušies    t
SFX } t  usies    t
SFX } t  ošies    t

SFX Z Y 23
SFX Z   t   stams     t
SFX Z   t   stama     t
SFX Z   t   stamam    t
SFX Z   t   stamu     t
SFX Z   t   stamā     t
SFX Z   t   stamas    t
SFX Z   t   stamai    t
SFX Z   t   stami     t
SFX Z   t   stamiem   t
SFX Z   t   stamus    t
SFX Z   t   stamos    t
SFX Z   t   stamām    t
SFX Z   t   stamās    t
SFX Z   t   stamais   t
SFX Z   t   stamajam  t
SFX Z   t   stamo     t
SFX Z   t   stamajā   t
SFX Z   t   stamajai  t
SFX Z   t   stamie    t
SFX Z   t   stamajiem t
SFX Z   t   stamajos  t
SFX Z   t   stamajām  t
SFX Z   t   stamajās  t

SFX )   Y 23
SFX )   t   jams     t
SFX )   t   jama     t
SFX )   t   jamam    t
SFX )   t   jamu     t
SFX )   t   jamā     t
SFX )   t   jamas    t
SFX )   t   jamai    t
SFX )   t   jami     t
SFX )   t   jamiem   t
SFX )   t   jamus    t
SFX )   t   jamos    t
SFX )   t   jamām    t
SFX )   t   jamās    t
SFX )   t   jamais   t
SFX )   t   jamajam  t
SFX )   t   jamo     t
SFX )   t   jamajā   t
SFX )   t   jamajai  t
SFX )   t   jamie    t
SFX )   t   jamajiem t
SFX )   t   jamajos  t
SFX )   t   jamajām  t
SFX )   t   jamajās  t
