ext/spell/lv_LV.dic
aizirt/(+JdIehB}M[65
aiznērst/+4FIe3
aizost/+IE2
aizpaist/+%JI7eM
aizpūst/+IBN
aizspiest/+EJ]I2N
aizsteigt/%J5IB+a6d[M
aizsukāt/)+gBdIb1HGM$J[{
aizsvilt/+eZ^dBJ[I74M
aiztirgot/)+d{bGgHB01
aiztrenkt/+I6dJ[MaB%5
aizvandīt/+hbBIJ[(1MC
apart/+Jh4BI}[e(6M
apaust/+IEN2]
apbirt/+^JIeZMB74
apcirst/dBJN+I]
apjaust/NI+B3
apkalt/Z+IJeM^[7B46}
apkaunināt/+IhCcM(bJdg[1B
apkraut/+[)$IMdJ6B5
apkrāpt/+)$eIMBJ6[4
aplišķēt/J+MB$IHb)1
aplīt/BIJ+MZ7^
apmaidzīt/(BI$+b{J1[MH
apmelst/e+4IMFJ3
apmest/I+dNB]
applaukšķināt/+B(bgJ[cId1MhC
apsist/+BdIN]
apslāpt/Z+^MIe7BJ4
apspiest/+EJN]I2
apstulbt/I+ZeB7^JM4
apsērst/+IeF3MJ4
apurgt/+aBIJM
apēst/E+IJN]
apķemmēt/+BIbM1H$)J
apķēpāt/+$)[H1gIJGBbd{M
apšaut/+I)M$5JB6
atbubināt/bg+MdB[h(I1cCJ
atciest/J+N
atdarīt/+hBI(bd4gJc1[MC
atdrāzt/e+dB6I[J4}M
atelst/+Fe3[IMJ}4
atgrūst/+JE2]N
atgult/e[+I^ZJdBM75
atkviekt/a%+IMJB65
atlīkt/M+aJI^Z7B4
atmaukt/+M6%aBI5J
atmest/I+Nd]B
atmezglot/+BIgHbG$d{1MJ)
atpogāt/+dgJGb[1I$MB){H
atriest/+FIe3J4M
atskaust/+N
atskurbt/eIB7+^JZM4
atspriest/+EI2NJ
atsvabināt/+I(M[dbchgBCJ1
atsvaidzināt/cMgh+bd[B(1IJC
atvīstīt/+hg(cBbIJd1MC
atžilbt/+e^ZBIJM74
atžūpot/+bIBHg)1MGdJ{
augt/+(IhMa8Jd[B}4
brist/]+EIJN
buknīt/b)+G{IgBd1J[$HM
burt/+JM(h[dB650
ciest/]+IdNB
dislocēt/Jb+dB${[G)IgHM1
dramatizēt/J[+)MbGg$dH{BI1
drāzt/e}+6dIMJB4[
dzirdināt/(cb+hgd[1IBMCJ
dzēst/[I+FJe}4M3
dūkt/+Ia%dBM[J56
frāzēt/+IB1$Jb)HM
ieblēt/+b${J)I[BM61
iecept/h+dB4I}(e[J8M
iegrimt/e+MZIB4J7^
iegrūst/+2EN
ieirgt/dBaI+[JM
iekampt/)+eIB46$JM
iekniebt/JeI4B6)+$M
iekrist/+JIBN
iekārot/+bJH$I)1BM
iekūst/%07+
ieliekt/d+hI(a%B}[685JM
iemelst/MF+[JIe3}4
iemest/+BIN]d
iemirdzēt/hI+c(dbMBg[JC1
iepaust/2E+JIN
iereibt/7BeI+4^ZJM
ieskāt/BI1+d$g)bGM[{HJ
iesprūst/+EIJ%N7
iesūdzēt/Cb+Ih(JB1M
ietempt/)e+B$JI46M
ietilpināt/+BIdhbgcM(1CJ[
ietūkt/Ia+^ZMBJ47
ievest/+EIJ]N
ieviest/3eM+JI[}F4
ievizuļot/b{+)GJBI1dMHg$
ievēkšķēt/+ghbd(BIcJMC1[
ieļimt/^+J4B7ZeIM
iešķiest/I+EJ2N
iežņaugt/%+M}6BadI5[J
izblāzmot/b+dB1g{)HG0
izdzēst/JeI+4MF}[3
izelst/eI+4F3JM
izfilmēt/bB+$H)IJ1M
izgulšņāt/+)$JGbgdI[B{1MH
izgāzelēt/dB+[)gIbH${G1MJ
izgāzt/6+JIB4ed[M
izjust/N+dI]BJ
izklīst/+E%7INJ
izlaizīt/+hbgdBIJM(c[1C
izlīgt/a+BMIJZ^74
izmaidzīt/+bd$IGJ[{gHBM1
iznest/eFI+(h8J}M[4
izpūst/3B+IN]
izpūt/aBI+^7ZJM4
izriest/JM+
izsisināt/bI+cB(g1dhJCM[
izsist/dNIB+]
izskaust/IE+N2
izslāpēt/Jb+B1I$H)M
izspirgt/I+^ZB7JMa4
izspraust/E+I]2NJ
izsūdzēt/dCbh+JI(cgMB[1
iztriept/+Ie)$6d[JBM4
iztērēt/d)H+b$gJG{[IBM1
izšķiest/I+]J2EN
izņirgt/+%IB5d6aJ[M
kapitalizēt/+BI$b)gHGd1M[J{
kniest/+IF}[e3J4M
knist/+JIBN
komandēt/B+)$bH1IMJ
kreditēt/+)gdJ$[MbGBI{H1
krist/+JId]BN
kāst/F+eJ[I}4M3
kūst/+%07
laidināt/BI(gMh+bc1Jd[C
līgt/+aMJ^BZI74
murmināt/b+gJI(1chdBC[M
muļļāt/BdH[$)G{Mbg+IJ1
mīlināt/+gbIhMdc[CJ(1B
mīņāt/MBI$+{dG)1[HbJg
noberzt/+6MJIeB[}4
nodzēst/IJe3+F4M
nogrūst/E+2]N
nokašāt/g+${dIG)BJMb[H1
noklanīt/hB+bgI(cCd1JM
noklīst/%IE+N7J
nokrāmēt/J+dgb)$[BIHGM1{
nokāst/3+F}eJIM[4
nokļūt/+^ZBJIa7M4
nolakot/bI+$JHg)d{GMB1
nolikt/+adB[JI4M
nolīgt/+aZMJB^I47
nomelst/I4F3J+eM
noraut/$+)5JIdB6
noskaust/E+I2N
noskumt/ZI+^7BeJ4M
noslapināt/+gh(IdcC[JbMB1
nospiest/E+I2JN
nosprakšķēt/Ch+bJ(IB1M
nospriegot/IB+${b)GHg1dMJ
nosvelpt/+BIe6[)$dMJ4
nosviest/+I2EJ]N
nosvilpt/e+B[$)6I4dMJ
notrūkt/+IaMJZB7^4
notēst/M3F+eJI4
novērst/+eFMI}
noziest/+INJ]
nošļakstīt/I1ghb+JBd[c(CM4
optimizēt/[+bgHGBId){$J1M
paberzt/+JIe[6MB4}
pabozt/6+I}JdeBM[4
pabriest/EJNI7+%
pabuknīt/M+1IB)${[HJb
pacelt/+[MIadJB5
pacirst/]+BdIJN
padriblēt/$MJ+bI)1BH
pakalt/+e7BIZ^JM64
paklīst/E+I%7JN
pakniest/eFJIM3+4
pakņudināt/Ic+JbMh([gBCd1
palaist/+E]J2N
palipt/+IeJBM4
papaust/J+N
paplucināt/+BdbI1gC(hJ[cM
papulēt/IJ+g$dB{[G)b1MH
parunāt/bG+I$JB)d1[gH{M
parāt/+{b$)dBIg1[J6GM
paslīkt/+^aJZBI4M7
pasnaust/I2+EJ]N
paspiest/EI+J2]N
paspodrināt/+MId(ghcb[JB1C
patvīkt/+IaB7J^ZM4
paviļāt/+GdB$J)1IbHg[M{
paziest/JI+N
pašķiest/I+EJN2
pažņaugt/+%M}I6Ba5[J
pelnošs/a+io}Y
perināt/+IhdM(cC[bgBJ1
piebļaut/+$I)MB65J
pieelst/+eIJF34M
pieglaust/+IJN]
piejokot/g+$)GIdBHb{1
pieklust/eM+F4IJ7
piekost/+EJ]2IN
pielaist/+EN]2J
pielādēt/I+b$JB)1HM
pieplacināt/(bJ[+dBcgCIh1M
pieplūkt/+d%MIa6J[B5
pieriest/+IeFM3J4
pieskumt/+eZ^IB7MJ4
piespiest/2+IJE]N
piesviest/+IJEN2
piesēt/+^Z7$IJ)bg{dGB1M6
pieturēt/Ccb+hJBdI(g1M[
piežaut/+)IJ5B$6M
proklamēt/+{b1gI$Bd[GH)JM
pārauļot/+$I)1MbHBJ
pārberzt/M+6BIeJ}[4
pārbrist/I+EN]J
pārgrūst/2+E]Nq
pārhromēt/+$bJIB1H)M
pārlasīt/+dBbc(I[Mgh1JC
pārlēkšot/+JM)gIdHb$G1B{
pārmelst/+[e4FIJ}3M
pārost/+N
pārpampt/+ZJe^IB74M
pārrūkt/+[%aJ6BI5dM
pārsalt/I+e7BZ^JM4
pārsist/+BI]dN
pārspriest/E2N+IJ
pārķeksēt/+)bMI$JHB1
pāršaustīt/1BI(+cbghdJMC[
pērt/+%IdeJ[B6M4
riest/F+IeJM4}3
rutinēt/+bJ$)HIBM1
rūkt/+hIa%dBM[J56
saaust/E+IN2]J
sabozt/+6IJdeB}[M4
sadzimt/M^J+Ie7B4Z
sagandēt/+Mgd$Gb)H{[JIB1
sagurt/+I^eBJZ4M7
saklīst/+7I%ENJ
sakutināt/+M(dbhcI[JCBg1
salaist/E+J2N]
samēzt/6+[JBe}MI4
saplaukt/+ZaB4I^7JM
saraukt/%MJ[+aI6Bd5
sasaistīt/cb+(hgd[MBI1JC
saskrullēt/+bM{$[1IB)GHgJd
sasmaidīt/g+BdbMI(1Jch[C
saspringt/+MaI7BZJ^4
satenterēt/b+J$)HIBM1
satēst/M3F+eIJ4
savārgt/+JaI^ZMB74
sažaut/+$J)56BIM
secēt/+$BIJdb{1HG)g[M
sist/+BdI]N
spiest/I+N2E]J
springt/^+7aZBI4JM
tūkt/Z+Ia^BMJ47
uguņot/+{)$bJdGMHgBI1
uzamizēt/$+[J1BIdGHb)gM{
uzberzt/J+}[M
uzdrošināt/(JIB+dbg1c[hMC
uzgvelzt/4BJI6+eM
uzknābt/+eI$B)J6M[
uzplēst/+MeIJ3F}[4
uzpūst/+IdBN]
uzskaust/+N
uzspiest/E+]JI2N
uzsprāgt/+aZB4^MIJ7
uzsākt/+hJIM}[aB4(d8
uztriekt/+a%dB6I[JM5
uztūkt/+BIJa^ZM74
uzāķēt/HBd)+b$M{gGI[J1
uzšķūrēt/+JI[$gbGdMB{1H
ķepināt/+hd(1IBCcgbJ[M
šķetināt/+dBbhI[MCcg(J1
šūpot/+IB1bMGd{g)J$H
